DI-96

DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINE

DIDY7-01

DTC P1250/34*| Turbocharger system malfunction
DTC P1255/34*| Turbocharger stick detected (Close)
DTC P1256/34*| Turbocharger stick detected (Open)
HINT:
*: Only for Europe
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area
When the condition that the turbocharger pressure exceeds the *VNT valve
P1250/34 standard value for 5 sec. or more is detected. * Turbocharger
*EGR valve
Condition that turbocharger pressure is high for 20 sec. is * Vacuum ho§e
P1255/34 . *E-VRYV for intake pressure charge
detected twice.
*\/SV for turbo pressure sensor
« Airflow meter
P1256/34 Turbocharger pressure is low for 40 sec. is detected twice. « Engine ECU

WIRING DIAGRAM
Refer to DTC P0105/35 on page DI-32.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:

IfDTCPO 105/35is outputsimultaneously, firsttroubleshoot DTC PO

When using intelligent tester II:

105/35.

1 Check connection of vacuum hose.

1HD-FTV ENGINE SUP

e )

Repair or replace.
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2CheckvacuumbetweenturbochargerandE  -VRVforintake pressure change at
900 rpm.

PREPARATION:

(a)Usinga3 -way connector, connectavacuumgaugetothe hose betweenthe E -VRV andturbocharger.
(b) Warmuptheenginetoabove80  °C (176°F).

CHECK:

Check the vacuum at 900 rpm.

RESULT:

Type Vacuum
| 0kPa (0 mmHg, 0in.Hg) to 50 kPa (375 mmHg, 14.8in.Hg)
Il Above50kPa (375mmHg, 14.8in.Hg)

Type> Go to step 7.

Type | \

3 | Check voltage between terminal VNT of engine ECU connector and body ground.

PREPARATION:
VNT (@) Remove the glove compartment door.
/ (b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
‘{%ﬁ\jﬂ% T I-Illlll I|I|I i I|I|II|I|I Illll CHECK:
(B B ) HEE L Measure the voltage between terminal VNT of the engine ECU

£

W W connector and body ground.

OK:
Voltage:9to 14V

Y A23883

VNT SignalWaveforms ~ 5V/DIV. Reference:INSPECTION USING OSCILLOSCOPE

During EGR system is ON (engine speed 900 rpm), check the

VNT waveformbetweenterminalsVNTandE 1 oftheengine ECU
connector.

<« GND HINT:
The correct waveform is as shown.
1 msec./Division A05567 NGé’tOSteP&
OK
\/
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4 Checkoperationof E

-VRVforintake pressure change.

E-VRV:OFF

E-VRV:ON

%

A15518

@

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnectthe vacuumhosesfromthe E -VRV.
(b) Connect the intelligent tester Il to the DLCS3.
(¢)  Turnthe ignition switch ON and push the intelligent tester
[l main switch ON.
(d) Select the Active Test mode on the intelligent tester II.
CHECK:
Checkthe operationofthe E
intelligenttesterll.
OK:
E-VRVON:
Air from port E flows out through port F.
E-VRV OFF:
Air from port E flows out through air filter.

0K> Go to step 7.

-VRV whenitis operated bythe

5CHeck E -VRVforintake pressurechange (See Pub No.RM896E, page TC -15).

@

NG% blaceE -VRV.

6 Checkforopen and shortin harness and connector between E
ECU, and E-VRV and EFI OR ECD relay (See page IN-19).

-VRV andengine

1HD-FTVENGINESUP (RM 1179E)

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.
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7 Checkresistance of VSV for turbo pressure sensor (See Pub No. RM6 17E, page
TC-19).

NG> Replace VSV for turbo pressure sensor.

OK
~_—

8 | Check VSV for turbo pressure sensor.

PREPARATION:

(@ Remove the glove compartment door.

(b) Disconnectthe E 16 connectorofthe engine ECU.
(¢)  Turn the ignition switch ON.

W W W Check VSV function.

Connect between terminal PA of the engine ECU and
body ground (VSV is ON).

Disconnect between terminal PA of the engine ECU and

body ground (VSV is OFF).

|
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VSV is ON:
Air from pipe E flows out through air filter.
VSV is OFF:
Air from pipe E flows out through pipe G.

e (See page IN-19).

VSV: ON VSV: OFF
SV:0 SV:0 0Kl>ackandreplaceengineECU

9 | Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
VSV for turbo pressure sensor, VSV for turbo pressure sensor and EFI OR ECD

relay (See page IN-19).

1HD-FTVENGINESUP (RM 1179E)

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.
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10 | Check turbocharger assembly (See Pub No. RM896E, page TC-1).

NG> Replace turbocharger.

@

11 | Check EGR valve (See Pub No. RM896E, page EC-2).

NG> Replace EGR valve.

@

12 | Check air flow meter (See page DI-64).

NG> Replace air flow meter.

3

Check and replace engine ECU (See page
IN-19).

When not using intelligent tester II:

1 Check connection of vacuum hose.

NG> Repair or replace.

1HD-FTV ENGINE SUP (RM1179E)
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900 rpm.

2 [ Check vacuum between turbocharger and E-VRV for intake pressure change at

PREPARATION:

(@) Using a 3—-way connector, connect a vacuum gauge to the hose between the E-VRV and trubocharger.
(b) Warm up the engine to above 80°C (176°F).

CHECK:

Check the vacuum at 900 rpm.

RESULT:

Type Vacuum
I 0 kPa (0 mmHg, 0 in.Hg) to 50 kPa (375 mmHg, 14.8 in.Hg)
] Above 50 kPa (375 mmHg, 14.8 in.Hg)
Type> Go to step 6.
Type |

3 [ Check operation of E-VRV.

A18530

1HD-FTV ENGINE SUP (RM1179E)

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Disconnect the V14 connector from the engine ECU.
(c) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Check the E-VRV operation.
(1) Connect between terminal VNT of the engine ECU
connector and body ground (ON).
(2) Disconnect between terminal VNT of the engine
ECU connector and body ground (OFF).

OK:
E-VRV ON:
Air from port E flows out through port F.
E-VRV OFF:
Air from port E flows out through air filter.

OK> Go to step 6.
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4 | Check E-VRYV for intake pressure change (See Pub No. RM896E, page TC-15).

NG> Replace E-VRV.

@

5 [ Check for open and short in harness and connector between E-VRV and engine
ECU, and E-VRV and EFI OR ECD relay (See page IN-19).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

3

6 [ Check resistance of VSV for turbo pressure sensor (See Pub No. RM617E, page
TC-19).

NG> Replace VSV for turbo pressure sensor.

1HD-FTV ENGINE SUP (RM1179E)
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7 | Check VSV for turbo pressure sensor.

VSV: OFF

A23885

\/

PREPARATION:

(a) Remove the glove compartment door.

(b) Disconnect the E16 connector of the engine ECU.

(c)  Turn the ignition switch ON.

CHECK:

Check VSV function.

(@) Connect between terminal PA of the engine ECU and
body ground (VSV is ON).

(b) Disconnect between terminal PA of the engine ECU and
body ground (VSV is OFF).

VSV is ON:

Air from pipe E flows out through air filter.
VSV is OFF:

Air from pipe E flows out through pipe G.

OK Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN-19).

relay (See page IN-19).

8 [ Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
VSV for turbo pressure sensor, VSV for turbo pressure sensor and EFI OR ECD

OK

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

9 | Check turbocharger assembly (See Pub No. RM896E, page TC-1).

1HD-FTV ENGINE SUP (RM1179E)

NG> Replace turbocharger.
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10

Check EGR valve (See Pub No. RM896E, page EC-2).

NG> Replace EGR valve.

@

11

Check air flow meter (See page DI-64).

NG> Replace air flow meter.

@

Check and replace engine ECU (See page
IN-19).
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